South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S504.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Sections 44-53-445(A), (B), and (C) of the S.C. Code are amended to read: Section 44-53-445. (A) It is a separate criminal offense for a person to distribute, sell, purchase, manufacture, or to unlawfully possess with intent to distribute, a controlled substance while in, on, or within a one-half mile radius of the grounds of a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school;  a public playground or park;  a public vocational or trade school or technical educational center;  or a public or private college or university; a childcare facility as defined in Section 63-13-20; or a day program as defined in Section 44-20-30. (B) For a person to be convicted of an offense pursuant to subsection (A), the person must: (1) have knowledge that he is in, on, or within a one-half mile radius of the grounds of a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school;  a public playground or park;  a public vocational or trade school or technical educational center;  or a public or private college or university; a child care facility as defined in Section 63-13-20; or a day program as defined in Section 44-20-30;  and (2) actually distribute, sell, purchase, manufacture, or unlawfully possess with intent to distribute, the controlled substance within a one-half mile radius of the grounds of a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school;  a public playground or park;  a public vocational or trade school or technical educational center;  or a public or private college or university; a child care facility as defined in Section 63-13-20; or a day program as defined in Section 44-20-30. (C) A person must not be convicted of an offense pursuant to subsection (A) if the person is stopped by a law enforcement officer for the controlled substance offense within a one-half mile radius of the grounds of a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school;  a public playground or park;  a public vocational or trade school or technical educational center;  or a public or private college or university, but did not actually commit the controlled substance offense within a one-half mile radius of the grounds of a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school;  a public playground or park; a public vocational or trade school or technical educational center;  or a public or private college or university, or a child care facility as defined in Section 63-13-20; or a day program as defined in Section 44-20-30. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----